Utah statutes.
76-8-807.   Posting of signs at war or defense facilities -- Entering posted
premises without permission.
(1)  Any individual, partnership, association, corporation, municipal
corporation, or state or any political subdivision thereof engaged in, or
preparing to engage in, the manufacture, transportation or storage of any
product to be used in the preparation of the United States or of any of the
states for defense or for war or in the prosecution of war by the United
States, or the manufacture, transportation, distribution or storage of gas,
oil, coal, electricity or water, or any natural or artificial persons
operating any public utility, whose property, except where it fronts on water
or where there are entrances for railway cars, vehicles, persons, or things,
is surrounded by a fence or wall, or a fence or wall and buildings, may post
around his or its property at each gate, entrance, dock, or railway entrance
and every one hundred feet of water front a sign reading "No Entry Without
Permission."  The sign shall also designate a point of entrance or place where
application may be made for permission to enter, and permission shall not be
denied to any loyal citizen who has a valid right to enter.
(2)  Any person willfully entering property enumerated in Subsection (1),
without permission of the owner, shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
